Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-828
Director; powers relating to contracts and fees.

The director may contract with lottery game retailers on a permanent, seasonal, or temporary basis and may require payment of an initial application fee or an annual fee, or both, as provided in rules and regulations. All fees shall be credited to the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 48.